Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5148YH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2069 Section 1. Section 97B.49A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Annual adjustment of allowance. A 3 member who retires on or after July 1, 2026, and who receives a 4 monthly retirement allowance under this section, shall have the 5 monthly retirement allowance adjusted as follows: 6 a. On each July 1, the monthly retirement allowance 7 authorized in this section and payable to a member retired 8 prior to that date, and to a beneficiary or contingent 9 annuitant entitled to a monthly retirement allowance prior 10 to that date, shall be adjusted by adding to the monthly 11 retirement allowance payable on that date an amount equal to 12 the sum of one percent of the monthly retirement allowance 13 payable on that date. 14 b. A retired member, beneficiary, or contingent annuitant 15 shall not be eligible for an annual readjustment of allowance 16 provided in this subsection unless the member has attained the 17 age of fifty-five years prior to the memberâs termination of 18 employment. 19 c. A retired member, beneficiary, or contingent annuitant 20 that receives an annual adjustment of allowance provided in 21 this subsection shall not be eligible for the retirement 22 dividends under section 97B.49F. 23 Sec. 2. Section 97B.49B, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 24 following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Annual adjustment of allowance. A 26 member who retires from employment in a protection occupation 27 on or after July 1, 2026, and who receives a monthly retirement 28 allowance under this section, shall have the monthly retirement 29 allowance adjusted as follows: 30 a. On each July 1, the monthly retirement allowance 31 authorized in this section and payable to a member retired 32 prior to that date, and to a beneficiary or contingent 33 annuitant entitled to a monthly retirement allowance prior 34 to that date, shall be adjusted by adding to the monthly 35 -1- LSB 5148YH (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 2069 retirement allowance payable on that date an amount equal to 1 the sum of one percent of the monthly retirement allowance 2 payable on that date. 3 b. A retired member, beneficiary, or contingent annuitant 4 shall not be eligible for an annual readjustment of allowance 5 provided in this subsection unless the member has attained the 6 age of fifty-five years prior to the memberâs termination of 7 employment. 8 c. A retired member, beneficiary, or contingent annuitant 9 that receives an annual adjustment of allowance provided in 10 this subsection shall not be eligible for the retirement 11 dividends under section 97B.49F. 12